Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-911
Abuse of public records; penalty; public record, defined.

(1) A person commits abuse of public records, if:

(a) He knowingly makes a false entry in or falsely alters any public record; or

(b) Knowing he lacks the authority to do so, he intentionally destroys, mutilates, conceals, removes, or impairs the availability of any public record; or

(c) Knowing he lacks the authority to retain the record, he refuses to deliver up a public record in his possession upon proper request of any person lawfully entitled to receive such record; or

(d) He makes, presents, or uses any record, document, or thing, knowing it to be false, and with the intention that it be taken as a genuine part of the public record.

(2) As used in this section, the term public record includes all official books, papers, or records created, received, or used by or in any governmental office or agency.

(3) Abuse of public records is a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 196.